Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB31.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 189.2226 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Bill of lading" means a document evidencing the purchase of, or delivery
order for, building materials issued by a person engaged in a business that
sold or leased the building materials;
(b) "Building materials" means equipment or materials associated with new home
construction, home remodeling, or home maintenance, including but not
limited to:
1. Agriculture products;
2. Asphalt;
3. Concrete;
4. Crushed stone;
5. Excavation equipment;
6. Fill dirt and rock;
7. Glass;
8. Landscaping materials;
9. Lumber or other wood products;
10. Minerals;
11. Roofing materials; and
12. Steel products;
(c) "Home" means:
1. A site where a single or multi-family housing unit is being initially
constructed for which a building permit for construction has been issued
by the authorized local government in the city or county in which
construction will take place; and
Page 1 of 3
XXXX 12/10/2024 4:30 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 32
2. A site where construction of a single or multi-family housing unit is
complete and persons inhabit the housing unit; and
(d) "State road" means a state or federal highway but does not mean an interstate
or county road.
(2) Other statutes to the contrary in this chapter notwithstanding, any vehicle hauling
building materials to a home shall be allowed, subject to the provisions and
limitations of this section, to travel on any state road without a permit and without
being subject to a fine, if the weight of the vehicle is within the limits of the
registration issued to the vehicle and within the axle limits for the vehicle, even if
the vehicle's gross weight or length, including vehicle and load, exceed the limits
prescribed by this chapter or in other aspects fail to comply with this chapter.
(3) A vehicle hauling building materials under this section shall be allowed to travel the
most direct route, in the opinion of the operator, to the vehicle's point of destination,
provided any road traveled as the most direct route shall not be further than fifteen
(15) miles from a state road that is classified to carry the registered weight of the
vehicle. If a vehicle is traveling a road classified by the cabinet as a single "A"
highway, the vehicle or its load cannot exceed ninety-six (96) inches in width. If a
vehicle or its load exceed ninety-six (96) inches in width, the operator shall be
required to obtain the appropriate overdimensional permit required by this chapter
to travel the proposed route. The operator of a vehicle hauling building materials
under this section shall have in his or her possession a bill of lading.
(4) All vehicles hauling building materials under this section shall be prohibited from
exceeding the established width and posted bridge weight limits for any route the
vehicle travels. A vehicle that exceeds the width or bridge limits for its posted
routes shall be required to obtain the appropriate overdimensional or overweight
permit required by this chapter.
(5) (a) A person who is constructing more than ten (10) homes located within a one
Page 2 of 3
XXXX 12/10/2024 4:30 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 32
(1) mile radius shall apply for a permit before operating under the
exemptions granted in subsection (2) of this section.
(b) The Transportation Cabinet shall require all persons applying for a permit
issued under this subsection to enter into a cooperative agreement with the
cabinet that provides for an equitable apportionment and payment of the
incremental costs for design, maintenance, construction, or reconstruction
of the state roads on which the person will be operating under the permit.
(c) The cabinet may require as part of a cooperative agreement that the person
post a bond to ensure payment of the person's portion of incremental costs
described in paragraph (b) of this subsection, and all funds collected under
this subsection shall be expended for those purposes.
Page 3 of 3
XXXX 12/10/2024 4:30 PM Jacketed